Vermont, session 2025-2026, H447.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 3581 is amended to read:
§ 3581. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS
(a) A person who is the owner of a dog or wolf-hybrid more than six
months old shall annually on or before April 1 cause it to be registered,
numbered, described, and licensed on a form approved by the Secretary for one
year from that day in the office of the clerk of the municipality in which the
dog or wolf-hybrid is kept. A person who owns a working farm dog and who
intends to use that dog on a farm pursuant to the exemptions in section 3549 of
VT LEG #381071 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.447
2025 Page 2 of 3
this title shall cause the working farm dog to be registered as a working farm
dog and shall, in addition to all other fees required by this section, pay $5.00
for a working farm dog license. The owner of a dog or wolf-hybrid shall cause
it to wear a collar and attach a license tag issued by the municipal clerk to the
collar. Dog or wolf-hybrid owners shall pay for the license $4.00 for each
neutered dog or wolf-hybrid, and $8.00 for each unneutered dog or wolf-
hybrid. If the license fee for any dog or wolf-hybrid is not paid on or before
After April 1 of a given license year, its the owner or keeper may thereafter
procure a license for that license year by paying a fee of 50 percent in excess
of that otherwise required.
(b) Before a person shall be entitled to obtain a license for a neutered dog
or wolf-hybrid, he or she the person shall exhibit to the clerk a certificate
signed by a duly licensed veterinarian showing that the dog or wolf-hybrid has
been sterilized.
* * *
(d)(1) Before obtaining a license for a dog or wolf-hybrid six months of
age or older, a person shall deliver to the municipal clerk a certificate or a
certified copy thereof issued by a duly licensed veterinarian, stating that the
dog or wolf-hybrid has received a current preexposure rabies vaccination with
a vaccine approved by the Secretary, and the person shall certify that the dog
or wolf-hybrid described in the certificate or copy is the dog or wolf-hybrid to
VT LEG #381071 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.447
2025 Page 3 of 3
be licensed. The municipal clerk shall keep the certificates or copies thereof
on file. The Secretary shall prescribe the size and format of rabies certificates.
The owner of any such dog or wolf-hybrid shall maintain a copy of the rabies
vaccination form certificate and provide it to State or municipal officials upon
request.
(2) The rabies vaccination certificate shall include the following:
(A) the signature of the veterinarian;
(B) the dog or wolf-hybrid owner’s name and address;
(C) the species, sex, age, color, and primary breed of the animal; and
(D) the vaccination number and expiration date.
(3) Veterinarians must present a list of rabies vaccinations to the
municipal clerk every 30 days.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381071 v.1